Tennessee, session 114, SB2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 3, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a state governmental entity shall
disclose records and information to a member of the general assembly to enable the
member to determine whether the laws of this state are being complied with and to
determine whether the laws of this state need to be changed; provided, that the
procedures set out in this section and any other procedures required by law are
followed.
(b) If a member of the general assembly receives a written inquiry regarding
whether the laws of this state are being complied with or whether the laws of this state
need to be changed, then the member of the general assembly may submit a written
request to the state governmental entity that has records relevant to the inquiry,
requesting review of the records and information. The written request must include any
information that will assist the records custodian in locating the records and information.
(c) The member shall sign a form, before reviewing the records and information,
that outlines applicable state and federal laws regarding confidentiality and the penalties
for the unauthorized release of the records and information. All records and information
being reviewed by a member must remain in the governmental entity's possession.
SB2034
011498
- 1 -

(d) After reviewing the records and information, if the member requests access
to additional records and information, then the governmental entity shall discuss with the
member the circumstances related to the records and information being disclosed.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011498